ro-RO: Feronerie > Încuietori și chei > Încuietori și zăvoare: Zăvoare cilindrice; Zăvoare cu camă; Opritoare; Zăvoare cu arc
zh-TW: 硬體 > 鎖和鑰匙 > 鎖閂: 門栓; 梅花鎖; 閂條; 閂鎖
nb: Maskinvare > Låser og nøkler > Låser og hengsler: Tønnebolter; Kamlåser; Låsefaller; Låser
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 锁与钥匙 > 锁和插销: 圆筒门闩; 凸轮锁; 门闩; 闩锁
pl: Sprzęt > Zamki i klucze > Blokady i zatrzaski: Zasuwki ryglowe; Zamki hakowe; Zamki ryglowe; Zatrzaski
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Spynos ir raktai > Spynos ir skląsčiai: Skląsčiai; Cilindrinės spynos; Rakinimo skląsčiai; Liežuvėliai
vi: Phần cứng > Khóa & Chìa khóa > Khóa và chốt: Bu lông thùng; Khóa cam; Chốt cố định; Then cửa
pt-BR: Ferragens > Cadeados e chaves > Fechaduras e trincos: Trincos; Fechaduras de came; Fechaduras; Travas
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Sloten en sleutels > Sloten en grendels: Cilinderbouten; Nokkensloten; Nachtsloten; Grendels
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > แม่กุญแจและลูกกุญแจ > ล็อคและกลอน: สลักบานเลื่อน; ตัวเชื่อมต่อล็อค; กุญแจลิ้นตาย; สลัก
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Zámky a klíče > Zámky a závory: Západky s kličkou; Nábytkové zámky; Americké zámky; Dveřní západky
ja: DIY用品 > 鍵 > 錠・掛金: バレルボルト; カムロック; デッドボルト; ラッチ
bg-BG: Железария > Брави и ключове > Брави и ключалки: Резета; Тръбни заключващи механизми; Брави тип резе; Закопчалки
fr: Quincaillerie > Serrures et clés > Verrous et loquets: Verrous pistolets; Serrures à cale; Verrous à clé; Loquets
sk-SK: Náradie > Zámky a kľúče > Zámky a západky: Valcové skrutky; Vačkové zámky; Závory; Západky
sv: Metallprodukter > Lås och låssmideri > Lås och hakar: Hylsbultar; Kamlås; Säkerhetslås; Spärrar
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Κλειδαριές & κλειδιά > Κλειδαριές & μάνδαλα: Κλείστρα με κυλινδρικό μηχανισμό; Έκκεντρες κλειδαριές; Κλειδαριές ασφαλείας; Μανδαλώσεις
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Ključavnice in ključi > Ključavnice in zapahi: Cevni zatiči; Ključavnice s kavljem; Zaklepne ključavnice; Zapahi
pt-PT: Equipamento > Cadeados e chaves > Fechos e trincos: Parafusos cilíndricos; Bloqueios de câmara; Fechaduras dead-bolt; Trincos
en: Hardware > Locks & Keys > Locks & Latches: Barrel Bolts; Cam Locks; Deadbolts; Latches
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Schlösser & Schlüssel > Schlösser & Riegel: Torschließbolzen; Haltenocken; Türriegel; Arretierungen
hu: Hardver > Zárak és kulcsok > Zárak és reteszek: Hengerzárak; Kampózárak; Biztonsági zárak; Reteszek
da: Isenkram > Låse og nøgler > Låse og klinker: Tøndebolte; Kamlåse; Dødbolte; Låse
tr: Hırdavat > Kilitler ve Anahtarlar > Kilitler ve Mandallar: Yuvarlak Cıvatalar; Kam Kilitleri; Sürgüler; Mandallar
ko: 철물 > 자물쇠/열쇠 > 자물쇠/걸쇠: 배럴 볼트; 캠록; 데드볼트; 걸쇠
hr-HR: Željezarija > Brave i ključevi > Brave i zasuni: Valjkasti zasuni; Brave sa zakretnim zasunima; Brave sa zasunom; Zasuni
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Замки и ключи > Замки и защелки: Дверные задвижки и шпингалеты; Почтовые замки; Ригельные замки; Защелки
es: Bricolaje > Llaves y cerrojos > Candados y pestillos: Pernos de barril; Cerraduras de leva; Cerrojos; Cierres
fi: Rakentaminen > Lukot ja avaimet > Lukot ja salvat: Salpalukot; Avainpesät; Turvalukot; Salvat
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Serrature e chiavi > Lucchetti e chiavistelli: Bulloni a barre; Serrature a camma; Catenacci; Chiusure